lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_semiFinalE-noHop.txt
!========================================
LEXICON NounInflVIII
!  for noun roots that have semi-final -e
!  that can be dropped but not hopped
!========================================

!----------------------------------------|
!              ABSOLUTIVE                |
!----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg]:%^                            #; [Abs][Pl]:%^%{.sf.%}et             #; [Abs][Du]:%^%{.sf.%}ek               #;
!----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ka  #; [Abs][Pl][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}enka  #; [Abs][Du][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egka    #;
[Abs][Sg][1PlPoss]:%^put                #; [Abs][Pl][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}put    #; [Abs][Du][1PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egput   #;
[Abs][Sg][1DuPoss]:%^pung               #; [Abs][Pl][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}pung   #; [Abs][Du][1DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpung  #;
!----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}en         #; [Abs][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^ten           #; [Abs][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egken   #;
[Abs][Sg][2PlPoss]:%^si                 #; [Abs][Pl][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}si     #; [Abs][Du][2PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egsi    #;
[Abs][Sg][2DuPoss]:%^tek                #; [Abs][Pl][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}tek    #; [Abs][Du][2DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egtek   #;
!----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}a          #; [Abs][Pl][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}i     #; [Abs][Du][3SgPoss]:%^kek             #;
[Abs][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}at         #; [Abs][Pl][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}it    #; [Abs][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egket   #;
[Abs][Sg][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}ak         #; [Abs][Pl][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}ik    #; [Abs][Du][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkek   #;
!----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
[Abs][Sg][4SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}ni          #; [Abs][Pl][4SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}ni     #; [Abs][Du][4SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egni    #;
[Abs][Sg][4PlPoss]:%^teng               #; [Abs][Pl][4PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}teng   #; [Abs][Du][4PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egteng  #;
[Abs][Sg][4DuPoss]:%^tek                #; [Abs][Pl][4DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}tek    #; [Abs][Du][4DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egtek   #;
!----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------|
!         ERGATIVE (relative)         |
!-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg]:%^%{.sf.%}em               #; [Erg][Pl]:%^%{.sf.%}et               #; [Erg][Du]:%^%{.sf.%}ek                #;
!-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg][1SgPoss]:%^ma              #; [Erg][Pl][1SgPoss]:%^ma              #;[Erg][Du][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egma      #;
[Erg][Sg][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mta      #; [Erg][Pl][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mta      #;[Erg][Du][1PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemta    #;
[Erg][Sg][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtung    #; [Erg][Pl][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtung    #; [Erg][Du][1DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemtung #;
!-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpek     #; [Erg][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpek     #; [Erg][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpek    #;
[Erg][Sg][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesi    #; [Erg][Pl][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesi    #; [Erg][Du][2PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpesi   #;
[Erg][Sg][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetek   #; [Erg][Pl][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetek   #; [Erg][Du][2DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpetek  #;
!-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}an      #; [Erg][Pl][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}an      #; [Erg][Du][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkenka  #;
[Erg][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}ita     #; [Erg][Pl][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}ita     #; [Erg][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkenka  #;
[Erg][Sg][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}ita     #; [Erg][Pl][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}ita     #; [Erg][Du][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkenka  #;
!-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Erg][Sg][4SgPoss]:%^mi              #; [Erg][Pl][4SgPoss]:%^mi              #; [Erg][Du][4SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmi     #;
[Erg][Sg][4PlPoss]:%^meng            #; [Erg][Pl][4PlPoss]:%^meng            #; [Erg][Du][4PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmeng   #;
[Erg][Sg][4DuPoss]:%^meng            #; [Erg][Pl][4DuPoss]:%^meng            #; [Erg][Du][4DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmeng   #;
!-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
!               ABLATIVE MODALIS               |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg]:%^meng                          #; [Abl.Mod][Pl]:%^neng                          #; [Abl.Mod][Du]:%^%{.sf.%}egneng                  #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mneng         #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mneng         #; [Abl.Mod][Du][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemneng       #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mnneng        #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mnneng        #; [Abl.Mod][Du][1PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemnneng      #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegneng      #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegneng      #; [Abl.Mod][Du][1DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemtegneng    #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpeneng       #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpeneng       #; [Abl.Mod][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpeneng       #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpegneng      #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpegneng      #; [Abl.Mod][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpegneng      #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesineng     #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesineng     #; [Abl.Mod][Du][2PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpesineng     #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegneng    #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegneng    #; [Abl.Mod][Du][2DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpetegneng    #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}aneng        #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}aneng        #; [Abl.Mod][Du][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkeneng       #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itneng       #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itneng       #; [Abl.Mod][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itneng         #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkeneng     #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itneng       #; [Abl.Mod][Du][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itneng         #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Abl.Mod][Sg][4SgPoss]:%^mineng               #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][4SgPoss]:%^mineng               #; [Abl.Mod][Du][4SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmineng       #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][4PlPoss]:%^meggneng             #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][4PlPoss]:%^meggneng             #; [Abl.Mod][Du][4PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmeggneng     #;
[Abl.Mod][Sg][4DuPoss]:%^megteneng            #; [Abl.Mod][Pl][4DuPoss]:%^megteneng            #; [Abl.Mod][Du][4DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmegteneng    #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
!             LOCATIVE (localis)               |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg]:%^mi                                #; [Loc][Pl]:%^ni                                #; [Loc][Du]:%^%{.sf.%}egni                        #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mni               #; [Loc][Pl][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mni               #; [Loc][Du][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemni             #;
[Loc][Sg][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mnni              #; [Loc][Pl][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mnni              #; [Loc][Du][1PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemnni            #;
[Loc][Sg][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegni            #; [Loc][Pl][1DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mtegni            #; [Loc][Du][1DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemtegni          #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpeni             #; [Loc][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpeni             #; [Loc][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpeni             #;
[Loc][Sg][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpegni            #; [Loc][Pl][2SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpegni            #; [Loc][Du][2SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpegni            #;
[Loc][Sg][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesini           #; [Loc][Pl][2PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpesini           #; [Loc][Du][2PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpesini           #;
[Loc][Sg][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegni          #; [Loc][Pl][2DuPoss]:%^%{.m.%}gpetegni          #; [Loc][Du][2DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egpetegni          #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}ani              #; [Loc][Pl][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}ani              #; [Loc][Du][3SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkeni             #;
[Loc][Sg][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itni             #; [Loc][Pl][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itni             #; [Loc][Du][3PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itni               #;
[Loc][Sg][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egkeni           #; [Loc][Pl][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itni             #; [Loc][Du][3DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}itni               #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][4SgPoss]:%^mini                     #; [Loc][Pl][4SgPoss]:%^mini                     #; [Loc][Du][4SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmini             #;
[Loc][Sg][4PlPoss]:%^meggni                   #; [Loc][Pl][4PlPoss]:%^meggni                   #; [Loc][Du][4PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmeggni           #;
[Loc][Sg][4DuPoss]:%^megteni                  #; [Loc][Pl][4DuPoss]:%^megteni                  #; [Loc][Du][4DuPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egmegteni          #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
!            ALLATIVE (terminalis)             |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg]:%^mun                                #; [All][Pl]:%^nun                                #; [All][Du]:%^%{.sf.%}egnun                        #;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mnun               #; [All][Pl][1SgPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mnun               #; [All][Du][1SgPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemnun             #;
[All][Sg][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mnnun              #; [All][Pl][1PlPoss]:%^%{.m.%}mnnun              #; [All][Du][1PlPoss]:%^%{.sf.%}egemnnun            #;
